apertium-cat-srd.srd.dix
    <pardef n="f/àghere__vblex" c="p.46">
      <e r="LR"><p><l>agher</l><r>àghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
      <e r="LR"><p><l>aghere</l><r>àghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
      <e>       <p><l>àghere</l><r>àghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>àghere</l><r>àghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantare"/></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>aghendi</l><r>àghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
      <e r="LR"><p><l>aghendi</l><r>àghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantende"/></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
      <e>       <p><l>aghende</l><r>àghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>aghende</l><r>àghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="ger"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__cantende"/></e>

      <e>       <p><l>atzo</l><r>àghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>aghes</l><r>àghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>aghet</l><r>àghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ai</l><r>àghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
      <e r="LR"><p><l>ait</l><r>àghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->
      <e>       <p><l>aghimus</l><r>àghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>aghides</l><r>àghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>aghent</l><r>àghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pri"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>aghia</l><r>àghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>aghias</l><r>àghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>aghiat</l><r>àghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>aghiamus</l><r>àghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>aghiais</l><r>àghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>aghiant</l><r>àghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e r="LR"><p><l>aghian</l><r>àghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pii"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e> <!-- @!LSC -->

      <e>       <p><l>atza</l><r>àghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>atzas</l><r>àghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>atzat</l><r>àghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>atzamus</l><r>àghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>atzais</l><r>àghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>atzant</l><r>àghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="prs"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>aghere</l><r>àghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>agheres</l><r>àghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>agheret</l><r>àghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>agheremus</l><r>àghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>aghereis</l><r>àghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>agherent</l><r>àghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pis"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e>       <p><l>aghe</l><r>àghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>aghe</l><r>àghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="sg"/><j/></r></p><par n="S__canta"/></e>
      <e>       <p><l>atzat</l><r>àghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>atzamus</l><r>àghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p1"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>aghide</l><r>àghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p2"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>atzant</l><r>àghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/><s n="p3"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>

      <e r="LR"><p><l>attu</l><r>àghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>atu</l><r>àghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>ata</l><r>àghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>atos</l><r>àghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="m"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
      <e>       <p><l>atas</l><r>àghere<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="fàghere"><i>f</i><par n="f/àghere__vblex"/></e>
    <e lm="fàghere parte"><i>f</i><par n="f/àghere__vblex"/><p><l><b/>parte</l><r><g><b/>parte</g></r></p></e>
    <e lm="fàghere parte" r="LR"><i>f</i><par n="f/àghere__vblex"/><p><l><b/>parti</l><r><g><b/>parte</g></r></p></e>
